North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-14.1 Agriculturally Derived Fuel Tax Fund [Repealed]

4-14.1-01.
Legislative policy and purpose. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 100, § 1; 1983, ch. 94, § 1; 1989, ch. 81, § 1; 1991, ch. 95, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-14.1-01.1.
Definition. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 439, § 7.

4-14.1-02.
Agricultural products utilization fund — Purposes. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 100, § 2; 1983, ch. 94, § 2; 1989, ch. 81, § 2; 1989, ch. 82, § 2; 1991, ch. 54, § 1; 1991, ch. 95, § 2; 1993, ch. 16, § 7; 2005, ch. 66, § 1; 2013, ch. 49, § 6; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-14.1-03.
Agricultural products utilization commission — Composition — Appointment. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 100, § 3; 1983, ch. 94, § 3; 1989, ch. 81, § 3; 1991, ch. 95, § 3; 1993, ch. 42, § 3; 2001, ch. 488, § 1; 2007, ch. 493, § 2; 2013, ch. 49, § 7; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-14.1-03.1.
Agricultural products utilization commission — Authority. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 95, § 4; 1993, ch. 16, § 8; 1997, ch. 48, § 13; 1999, ch. 19, § 10; 2005, ch. 57, § 2; 2005, ch. 66, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-14.1-04.
Agricultural products utilization commission — Meetings — Personnel — Reports. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 100, § 4; 1981, ch. 528, § 1; 1989, ch. 81, § 4; 1997, ch. 48, § 14; 2001, ch. 488, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-14.1-05.
Agricultural products utilization commission — Reimbursement — Compensation. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 100, § 5; 1989, ch. 81, § 5; 2001, ch. 67, § 1; 2009, ch. 72, §
12; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-14.1-06.
Agricultural products utilization commission — Administrative expenses. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 16, § 6; 1995, ch. 48, § 6; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-14.1-07.
Duration and limitation of ethanol plant production incentives — Report to budget section. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2003, ch. 57, § 8.

4-14.1-07.1.
Ethanol plant production incentives — Report to budget section. [Repealed]

Source:

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-14.1-07.2.
Ethanol production incentives — Payments for increased production. [Repealed]

Source:

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-14.1-08.
Ethanol production incentive — Calculation — Payment. [Repealed]

Source:

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-14.1-09.
Subsidy limitations. [Repealed]

Source:

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-14.1-10.
Ethanol production incentive fund — Continuing appropriation. [Repealed]

Source:

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.